Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,119
Costs.

If the defendant, or any one of several defendants, shall appear and disclaim all title, lien, and interest adverse to the plaintiff, such defendant shall recover costs. In other cases the costs shall abide the final decree, judgment or order in the action.

Laws 1921, c. 130, § 8, p. 542;

C.S.1922, § 5683;

C.S.1929, § 76-408;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,119.

Where defendant denies plaintiff's title, costs follow judgment. Hallowell v. Borchers, 150 Neb. 322, 34 N.W.2d 404 (1948).